District of Columbia statutes.
35-305

Certain prior laws not affected.

Nothing in §§ 35-301 to 35-304, inclusive, shall be held to limit the duty of common carriers by railroads or impair the rights of their employees under the Safety Appliance Act of March 2, 1893, as amended April 1, 1896, and March 2, 1903.

June 11, 1906, 34 Stat. 233, ch. 3073, § 5

History

1981 Ed., § 44-405.
1973 Ed., § 44-405.

Prior Codifications

The Act of March 2, 1893, as amended, referred to in this section, was codified as 45 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., and was repealed in 1994 by P.L. 103-272, § 7(b). For present law, see 49 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.

References in Text